New York, session 2025-2026, A7969.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subsection (c) of section 612 of the tax law is amended by 2 adding a new paragraph 48 to read as follows: 3 (48) Training stipends received under section two hundred-aa of the 4 general municipal law, to the extent includable in federal adjusted 5 gross income. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately, and shall apply to the 7 taxable year in which it shall take effect and to all subsequent taxable 8 years. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09870-01-5